Maryland, session 2026, HB0627.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–137.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COMMISSION” MEANS THE COMMISSION ON
HISTORY, CULTURE, AND CIVICS IN EDUCATION.
(B) (1) THERE IS A COMMISSION ON HISTORY, CULTURE, AND CIVICS IN
EDUCATION.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE COMMISSION IS TO:
(I) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE STATE BOARD AND THE
DEPARTMENT TO FURTHER THE DISCOVERY, INTERPRETATION, AND LEARNING OF
THE HISTORY, CULTURE, AND CIVICS OF THE UNITED STATES AND MARYLAND; AND

HOUSE BILL 627 3
(II) PROVIDE EQUITABLE LEARNING OUTCOMES REGARDLESS
OF A STUDENT’S FAMILY INCOME, RACE, ETHNICITY, DISABILITY, OR OTHER
CHARACTERISTICS CONSISTENT WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THE BLUEPRINT FOR
MARYLAND’S FUTURE IN § 1–303 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(C) (1) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS
APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR FROM A LIST OF NOMINEES:
(I) TWO MEMBERS REPRESENTING MARYLAND’S INDIGENOUS
AMERICAN TRIBES, WHICH INCLUDE THE LENAPE, NANTICOKE, PISCATAWAY,
CONOY, POWHATAN, ACCOHANNOCK, SHAWNEE, SUSQUEHANNOCK, TUTELO, AND
SAPONI TRIBES, NOMINATED BY THE MARYLAND COMMISSION ON INDIAN AFFAIRS;
(II) TWO MEMBERS REPRESENTING THE MARYLAND
LGBTQIA+ COMMUNITY, ONE OF WHOM IDENTIFIES AS TRANSGENDER,
NOMINATED BY THE MARYLAND LEGISLATIVE LGBTQIA+ CAUCUS;
(III) TWO MEMBERS REPRESENTING THE MARYLAND DISABLED
COMMUNITY, NOMINATED BY THE SECRETARY OF DISABILITIES;
(IV) TWO MEMBERS WHO ARE TEACHERS OR HOLD A TEACHING
LICENSE IN THE STATE:
1. ONE OF WHOM IS NOMINATED BY THE BALTIMORE
TEACHER’S UNION; AND
2. ONE OF WHOM IS NOMINATED BY THE MARYLAND
STATE EDUCATION ASSOCIATION;
(V) TWO MEMBERS REPRESENTING THE MARYLAND LATINO
COMMUNITY, NOMINATED BY THE MARYLAND LEGISLATIVE LATINO CAUCUS;
(VI) TWO MEMBERS REPRESENTING THE MARYLAND AFRICAN
AMERICAN COMMUNITY, NOMINATED BY THE LEGISLATIVE BLACK CAUCUS OF
MARYLAND;
(VII) TWO MEMBERS REPRESENTING THE MARYLAND ASIAN
AMERICAN AND PACIFIC ISLANDER COMMUNITY, NOMINATED BY THE MARYLAND
LEGISLATIVE ASIAN–AMERICAN AND PACIFIC–ISLANDER CAUCUS;
(VIII) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, TWO
MEMBERS REPRESENTING HIGHER EDUCATION:

HOUSE BILL 627
1. ONE OF WHOM IS NOMINATED BY THE CHANCELLOR
OF THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND; AND
2. ONE OF WHOM IS NOMINATED BY THE PRESIDENT OF
THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF COMMUNITY COLLEGES; AND
(IX) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS, OR THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE.
(2) THE INDIVIDUALS CONSIDERED FOR NOMINATION BY THE
CHANCELLOR OF THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(VIII)1 OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE INDIVIDUALS WHO REPRESENT
HISTORICALLY BLACK COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES IN THE STATE.
(D) (1) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE
COMMISSION SHALL REFLECT THE GENDER, RACIAL, ETHNIC, AND GEOGRAPHIC
DIVERSITY OF THE STATE.
(2) A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION SHALL HAVE
CLASSROOM EXPERIENCE OR EXPERIENCE IN DEVELOPING EDUCATIONAL CONTENT
STANDARDS.
(E) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 4 YEARS.
(2) THE TERMS OF MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS REQUIRED BY THE
TERMS PROVIDED FOR MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION ON JULY 1, 2026.
(F) THE COMMISSION MEMBERS SHALL ELECT A CHAIR FROM AMONG THE
MEMBERS.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE COMMISSION.
(H) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(I) THE COMMISSION SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 627 5
(1) EXAMINE THE HISTORY, CULTURE, AND CIVICS OF THE UNITED
STATES AND MARYLAND, INCLUDING:
(I) THE CONTRIBUTIONS OF NATIVE AMERICANS, LATINOS,
AFRICAN AMERICANS, AND ASIAN AMERICANS;
(II) THE CONTRIBUTIONS OF LESBIAN, GAY, BISEXUAL,
TRANSGENDER, AND QUEER INDIVIDUALS WITHIN THE MINORITY GROUPS;
(III) THE INTERSECTIONALITY OF SIGNIFICANT SOCIAL AND
CULTURAL FEATURES WITHIN THE MINORITY COMMUNITIES;
(IV) THE CONTRIBUTIONS AND PERSECUTION OF RELIGIOUS
MINORITIES;
(V) THE CONTRIBUTIONS OF THE MARYLAND DISABLED
COMMUNITY; AND
(VI) THE CONTRIBUTIONS OF WOMEN;
(2) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE STATE BOARD REGARDING
THE ADOPTION OF STANDARDS AND PROGRAMS THAT ACCURATELY REFLECT THE
DISCOVERY, INTERPRETATION, AND LEARNING OF THE HISTORY, CULTURE, AND
CIVICS OF THE UNITED STATES AND MARYLAND;
(3) MAKE ALL ACTIVITIES AND MATERIALS OF THE COMMISSION
AVAILABLE ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE, INCLUDING:
(I) LIVE AND ARCHIVED VIDEO STREAMING OF EACH
COMMISSION MEETING;
(II) MEETING AGENDAS, MATERIALS, AND NOTES; AND
(III) COMMISSION REPORTS; AND
(4) USE MULTIPLE COMMUNICATIONS METHODS TO PROVIDE
UPDATES AND ANNOUNCEMENTS RELATED TO THE COMMISSION.
(J) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 30 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2026, THE
COMMISSION SHALL REPORT ITS FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE STATE
BOARD, THE GOVERNOR, AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.

HOUSE BILL 627
(K) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, THE STATE BOARD SHALL:
(1) REVIEW THE COMMISSION’S FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS;
AND
(2) MAKE ANY APPROPRIATE CHANGES TO THE EDUCATIONAL
STANDARDS FOR PREKINDERGARTEN THROUGH GRADE 12.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the initial
members of the Commission on History, Culture, and Civics in Education shall expire as
follows:
(1) the eight members representing the indigenous American tribes,
Maryland Latino community, African American community, and Asian American and
Pacific Islander community in 2028; and
(2) the eight members representing the LGBTQIA+ community, disabled
community, teachers, and higher education in 2030.
SUBTITLE 14. COMMISSION ON HISTORIC, CULTURAL, AND CIVIC CONTRIBUTIONS
IN EDUCATION.
24–1401.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “COMMISSION” MEANS THE COMMISSION ON HISTORIC,
CULTURAL, AND CIVIC CONTRIBUTIONS IN EDUCATION.
24–1402.
THERE IS A COMMISSION ON HISTORIC, CULTURAL, AND CIVIC
CONTRIBUTIONS IN EDUCATION.
24–1403.
THE PURPOSE OF THE COMMISSION IS TO ASSIST THE STATE’S PUBLIC
SCHOOLS WITH:
(1) PROVIDING STUDENTS AN ACCURATE EDUCATION ON THE
HISTORIC ROLES PLAYED BY DIVERSE PEOPLE THROUGHOUT THE STATE’S AND THE
NATION’S PAST; AND
(2) REMAINING RESPONSIVE TO THE EVOLVING NEEDS OF STUDENTS
AND THEIR FAMILIES.
24–1404.

HOUSE BILL 627 7
(A) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, JOINTLY
APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE AND THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE:
(1) NINE MEMBERS, EACH OF WHOM IS AN EXPERT IN ACCURATE
INSTRUCTION, EDUCATION, AND CURRICULAR CONTENT IN ONE OF THE FOLLOWING
SUBJECTS:
(I) AFRICAN AMERICAN HISTORY AND CULTURE;
(II) ASIAN AMERICAN AND PACIFIC ISLANDER HISTORY AND
CULTURE;
(III) HISPANIC AND LATINO AMERICAN HISTORY AND CULTURE;
(IV) THE HISTORY AND CULTURE OF MARYLAND’S INDIGENOUS
PEOPLE AND THEIR DESCENDANTS;
(V) THE HISTORY AND CONTRIBUTIONS OF IMMIGRANTS;
(VI) JEWISH AMERICAN HISTORY AND CULTURE;
(VII) LGBTQ+ AMERICAN HISTORY AND CULTURE;
(VIII) MUSLIM AMERICAN HISTORY AND CULTURE; AND
(IX) THE HISTORY AND CONTRIBUTIONS OF WOMEN;
(2) SEVEN COMMUNITY MEMBERS, EACH RECOMMENDED BY ONE OF
THE FOLLOWING GENERAL ASSEMBLY CAUCUSES:
(I) THE MARYLAND LEGISLATIVE ASIAN–AMERICAN &
PACIFIC–ISLANDER CAUCUS;
(II) THE LEGISLATIVE BLACK CAUCUS OF MARYLAND;
(III) THE MARYLAND LEGISLATIVE JEWISH CAUCUS;
(IV) THE MARYLAND LEGISLATIVE LATINO CAUCUS;
(V) THE MARYLAND LEGISLATIVE LGBTQ+ CAUCUS;
(VI) THE MARYLAND LEGISLATIVE MUSLIM CAUCUS; AND
(VII) THE WOMEN LEGISLATORS OF MARYLAND;

HOUSE BILL 627
(3) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE STATE’S DISABLED COMMUNITY,
RECOMMENDED BY THE SECRETARY OF DISABILITIES;
(4) TWO LICENSED TEACHERS, CURRENTLY TEACHING COURSES
THAT INVOLVE SOCIAL STUDIES OR OTHER RELATED HISTORICAL CURRICULA;
(4) (5) TWO STUDENTS CURRENTLY ENROLLED IN A PUBLIC HIGH
SCHOOL IN THE STATE;
(5) (6) THREE REPRESENTATIVES FROM INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER
EDUCATION, SELECTED AS FOLLOWS:
(I) ONE FROM AN INSTITUTION WITHIN THE UNIVERSITY
SYSTEM OF MARYLAND;
(II) ONE FROM A COMMUNITY COLLEGE IN THE STATE; AND
(III) ONE FROM A HISTORICALLY BLACK COLLEGE OR
UNIVERSITY IN THE STATE THAT IS A SEPARATE ENTITY FROM THE ENTITY
REPRESENTED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM; AND
(6) (7) ONE CURRENT MEMBER OF THE PROFESSIONAL
STANDARDS AND TEACHER EDUCATION BOARD, RECOMMENDED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE BOARD.
(B) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE COMMISSION
SHALL REFLECT THE GENDER, RACIAL, ETHNIC, AND GEOGRAPHIC DIVERSITY OF
THE STATE.
(C) (1) EXCEPT FOR THE STUDENT MEMBER, THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS
4 YEARS.
(2) THE TERM OF A STUDENT MEMBER IS 1 YEAR.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL ELECT A CHAIR FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE COMMISSION.
(F) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION; BUT

HOUSE BILL 627 9
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
24–1405.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) THOROUGHLY STUDY THE COURSE TOPICS, CURRICULUM
STANDARDS, CURRICULUM RESOURCES, CURRICULUM UNITS, AND COURSE SYLLABI
CURRENTLY BEING USED TO TEACH STUDENTS IN THE STATE AND HOW THEY
REPRESENT THE HISTORY AND CULTURE OF DIVERSE GROUPS, INCLUDING:
(I) HOW THEY INCORPORATE BOTH THE SHARED AND
DISTINCT HISTORIES AND CULTURES ABOUT WHICH COMMISSION MEMBERS HAVE
EXPERTISE;
(II) WHETHER SOURCES PRODUCED BY MEMBERS OF A
COMMUNITY ARE USED IN LESSONS ABOUT THAT COMMUNITY; AND
(III) THE APPROXIMATE PROPORTION OF OVERALL
INSTRUCTIONAL TIME THAT IS DEDICATED TO THE HISTORIC, CULTURAL, AND CIVIC
CONTRIBUTIONS OF SPECIFIC DIVERSE GROUPS COMPARED TO OTHER TOPICS; AND
(2) STUDY CURRENT SCHOOL CALENDARS AND REQUIRED HOURS OF
INSTRUCTION AND WHETHER THEY ARE DESIGNED TO REFLECT THE TRADITIONS
AND CUSTOMS OF ALL MEMBERS OF A COMMUNITY.
(B) (1) AFTER THOROUGHLY STUDYING THE MATERIALS DESCRIBED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION, ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, AND
EVERY 4 YEARS THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSION SHALL MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS
TO:
(I) THE STATE BOARD TO UPDATE COURSE TOPICS,
CURRICULUM STANDARDS, CURRICULUM RESOURCES, CURRICULUM UNITS, AND
COURSE SYLLABI TO MORE ACCURATELY REFLECT, THROUGH EVIDENCE–BASED
FACTUAL HISTORY, THE CONTRIBUTIONS OF DIVERSE GROUPS; AND
(II) THE MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION TO
UPDATE TEACHER PREPARATION PROGRAMS TO INCLUDE INSTRUCTION ON
TEACHING THE ACCURATE HISTORY OF DIVERSE PEOPLE AND THEIR
CONTRIBUTIONS TO THE HISTORICAL, CULTURAL, AND CIVIC LIFE OF THE STATE
AND NATION.

HOUSE BILL 627
(2) IF THE STATE BOARD UPDATES ANY COURSE TOPICS,
CURRICULUM STANDARDS, CURRICULUM RESOURCES, CURRICULUM UNITS, OR
COURSE SYLLABI IN RESPONSE TO THE COMMISSION’S REPORT, THE STATE BOARD
SHALL IDENTIFY EXISTING COURSES AND MATERIALS THAT MAY BE ADAPTED INTO
PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT COURSES TO ASSIST EDUCATORS WITH TEACHING
UPDATED LESSONS.
(C) AFTER THOROUGHLY STUDYING SCHOOL CALENDARS AND REQUIRED
HOURS OF INSTRUCTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS
SECTION, ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 1, 2027, AND EVERY 4 YEARS THEREAFTER, THE
COMMISSION SHALL MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS ON POTENTIAL ADJUSTMENTS
THAT WOULD BETTER REFLECT THE CUSTOMS AND TRADITIONS OF ALL COMMUNITY
MEMBERS TO THE STATE BOARD AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL COMPLETE ANY OTHER TASKS JOINTLY
ASSIGNED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE AND THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Commission on Historic,
Cultural, and Civic Contributions in Education, established under § 24–1402 of the
Education Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, shall report on or before December
1, 2029, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on whether the
Commission has adequately accomplished its goals and whether the Commission should
continue.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.